Maryland, session 2025, SB1039.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis
2–207.
(b) There is a Class 5 brewery license.
(f) (1) (i) A local licensing board may grant an on–site consumption permit
to an applicant that holds a Class 5 brewery license and, subject to paragraph (5) of this
subsection, a Class D beer license.
(2) Subject to the maximum volume limit under paragraph (4) of this
subsection, a Class D beer license or an equivalent license under paragraph (5) of this
subsection entitles the holder to sell to an individual who has attained the legal drinking
age, for on–premises consumption at the brewery:
(i) beer:
1. of which the holder of the Class 5 license is the brand
owner; and
– 1 –

Ch. 144 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
2. that is fermented and brewed entirely by the license
holder at a location authorized by this section;
(ii) beer that is fermented and brewed entirely at the brewery under
contract with a brand owner who does not possess a Class 5 license; and
(iii) subject to paragraph (3) of this subsection, beer brewed at a
location other than the Class 5 brewery if:
1. the brand owner of the beer is the holder of the Class 5
license or an affiliate of the holder of the Class 5 license;
2. the number of barrels of the beer sold for on–premises
consumption under the Class D beer license or an equivalent license or an on–site
consumption permit in a calendar year does not exceed the greater of:
A. [25%] 35% of the total number of barrels of beer sold for
on–premises consumption under the Class D license or an equivalent license or an on–site
consumption permit in that calendar year; or
B. 1.2% of total finished production under the Class 5
brewery license; and
3. A. the license holder contracts with or on behalf of a
holder of a manufacturer’s license or nonresident dealer’s permit; or
B. the beer is manufactured by an affiliate of the license
holder.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, April 22, 2025.
– 2 –